Nebraska, session 109, LB726.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB726 LB726
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-2104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2104 The board shall have power to:
(1) Elect its own officers;
(2) Engage and fix the compensation of such officers, inspectors,
and employees as may be required in the performance of its duties;
(3) Pay such other expenses as may be necessary in the performance
of its duties;
(4) Provide upon request such additional voluntary inspections and
reviews as it deems appropriate;
(5) Adopt, promulgate, and revise rules and regulations necessary to
enable it to carry into effect the State Electrical Act. In adopting and
promulgating such rules and regulations, the board shall be governed by
the minimum standards set forth in the National Electrical Code issued
and adopted by the National Fire Protection Association beginning in the
2026 2023 edition of the National Electrical Code, Publication Number
70-2026 70-2023, except that the minimum standards set forth in the 2017
edition of the National Electrical Code shall apply for sections
210.8(A), 210.8(A)(3), 210.8(A)(5), 230.70(A)(1) 230.67(A), and 230.70(B)
(2) 230.85. Each edition of the National Electrical Code mentioned in
this subdivision shall be filed in the offices of the Secretary of State
and the board during the time the edition is in use under this
subdivision and shall be a public record. The board shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations establishing wiring standards that
protect public safety and health and property and that apply to all
electrical wiring which is installed subject to the State Electrical Act;
(6) Revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any license or registration
granted pursuant to the State Electrical Act when the licensee or
registrant (a) violates any provision of the National Electrical Code as
adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section, the act, or any rule
or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, (b) fails or
-2-

LB726 LB726
2026 2026
refuses to pay any examination, registration, or license renewal fee
required by law, (c) is an electrical contractor or master electrician
and fails or refuses to provide and keep in force a public liability
insurance policy as required by the board, or (d) violates any political
subdivision's approved inspection ordinances;
(7) Order disconnection of power to any electrical installation that
is proximately dangerous to health and property;
(8) Order removal of electrical wiring and apparatus from premises
when such wiring and apparatus is proximately dangerous to health and
property;
(9) Investigate, for the purpose of identifying dangerous electrical
wiring or violations of the National Electrical Code as adopted pursuant
to subdivision (5) of this section, any death by electrocution that
occurs within the State of Nebraska;
(10) Refuse to renew any license granted pursuant to the act when
the licensee fails to submit evidence of completing the continuing
education requirements under section 81-2117.01;
(11) Provide for the amount and collection of fees for inspection
and other services;
(12) Adopt a seal, and the executive secretary shall have the care
and custody thereof; and
(13) Enforce the provisions of the National Electrical Code as
adopted pursuant to subdivision (5) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-2104, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-